Utah statutes.
57-25-113.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101 of that Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(a), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103 of that Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).



Enacted by Chapter 51, 2006 General Session

